Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.110

Scientific permanent fund.

There shall be in the state treasury a permanent fund known as the "scientific permanent fund," into which shall be paid all moneys derived from the sale of lands set apart by the enabling act or otherwise for a scientific school. The income derived from investments pursuant to RCW 43.84.080 and 43.33A.140 shall be credited to the Washington State University building account less the applicable allocations to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 or to the state investment board expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160.

[ 2007 c 215 s 7; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 96; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.110. Prior: 1901 c 81 s 4; RRS s 5526.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Contingent effective date—2007 c 215: See notes following RCW 39.42.070.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.